zh-TW: 鑽孔方式: DTH; 打擊樂器; 旋轉; 頂錘; 其他
en: Drilling method: DTH; Percussion; Rotary; Top hammer; Other
ko: 드릴링 방식: DTH; 퍼커션; 회전; 탑 해머; 기타
pl: Metoda wiercenia: DTH; Perkusja; Rotacyjny; Młotek górny; Inne
hr-HR: Način bušenja: DTH; Perkusija; Rotacijsko; Bušenje s čekićem; Ostalo
da: Boremetode: DTH; Perkussion; Roterende; Tophammer; Andet
nb: Boremetode: DTH; Perkusjon; Roterende; Topphammer; Annet
nl: Boormethode: DTH; Percussie; Roterend; Tophamer; Andere
vi: Phương pháp khoan: DTH; Bộ gõ; Xoay; Búa trên; Khác
lt-LT: Gręžimo būdas: DTH; Smūginis; Rotacinis; Viršutinis plaktukas; Kita
bg-BG: Метод на пробиване: DTH; Перкусионно; Ротационно; Горен чук; Други
tr: Delme Yöntemi: DTH; Perküsyon; Döner; Üst çekiç; Diğer
ru: Способ бурения: DTH; Ударные инструменты; Вращение; Верхний молоток; Другой
pt-BR: Método de perfuração: DTH; Percussão; Rotativo; Martelo superior; Outro
ja: 穴あけ方法: DTH; パーカッション; ロータリー; トップハンマー; その他
es: Método de perforación: DTH; Instrumentos de percusión; Giratoria; Martillo superior; Otros
zh-CN: 钻孔方法: DTH; 打击乐器; 旋转型; 顶锤; 其他
pt-PT: Método de perfuração: DTH; Percussão; Rotativo; Top hammer; Outro
sk-SK: Metóda vŕtania: DTH; Perkusný; Rotačný; Horné kladivo; Iné
cs: Způsob vrtání: DTH; Bicí nástroje; Rotační; S vrtacím kladivem; Jiné
de: Bohrmethode: DTH; Schlagbohren; Rotierend; Spitzenhammerbohren; Sonstiges
hu: Fúrási mód: DTH; Ütvefúrás; Rotációs; Top hammer; Egyéb
el: Μέθοδος διάτρησης: DTH; Κρούση; Περιστροφικός; Top hammer; Άλλο
fi: Porausmenetelmä: DTH; Perkussiot; Pyörivä; Ylävasara; Muu
sv: Borrmetod: DTH; Slagverk; Roterande; Topphammare; Övrigt
th: วิธีการเจาะ: DTH; การเจาะแบบกระแทก; โรตารี; การเจาะแบบหมุนและกระแทก; อื่นๆ
it: Metodo di perforazione: DTH; A percussione; A rotazione; Top hammer; Altro
fr: Méthode de forage: DTH; Percussions; Rotatif; Marteau supérieur; Autre
ro-RO: Metodă perforare: DTH; Percuție; Rotativă; Ciocan de suprafață; Altele
sl-SI: Način vrtanja: DTH; Udarni; Rotacijski; Globinsko; Drugo